Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF5024.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [62J.809] HOSPITAL-ASSOCIATED INFECTION COSTS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Health care facility" means any hospital, ambulatory surgical center, or other inpatient or outpatient facility where patients receive medical treatment. new text end new text begin (c) "Hospital-associated infection" or "HAI" means any infection that a patient acquires during the course of receiving treatment in a health care facility that was not present or incubating at the time of admission, including but not limited to: new text end new text begin (1) surgical site infections; new text end new text begin (2) catheter-associated urinary tract infections; new text end new text begin (3) central line-associated bloodstream infections; new text end new text begin (4) ventilator-associated pneumonia; new text end new text begin (5) clostridioides difficile infections; and new text end new text begin (6) other health care-associated infections, as defined by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention. new text end new text begin (d) "Treatment costs" means all costs associated with diagnosing, treating, and managing an HAI, including but not limited to extended hospitalization, additional procedures, medications, laboratory tests, and follow-up care. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Prohibition on charging for HAI treatment. new text end new text begin (a) No health care facility shall charge, bill, or seek payment from any patient or payer for the treatment costs of any HAI. new text end new text begin (b) This prohibition applies regardless of whether the patient has private health insurance, is self-pay, or has any other form of nongovernmental coverage. new text end new text begin (c) The prohibition in paragraph (a) includes: new text end new text begin (1) all facility charges associated with extended hospitalization due to HAI; new text end new text begin (2) all professional services rendered to treat the HAI; new text end new text begin (3) all medications, laboratory tests, imaging, and other diagnostic services related to HAI treatment; new text end new text begin (4) all rehabilitation or follow-up care necessitated by the HAI; and new text end new text begin (5) any charges from subcontractors treating the HAI. new text end new text begin (d) The health care facility where the HAI was acquired shall bear full financial responsibility for all treatment costs, regardless of where subsequent treatment is provided. If the facility where the HAI was acquired is not qualified to treat the HAI in its facility, the facility is financially liable for the cost of treatment at another facility. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 62J.81, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Prohibition on open-ended promise-to-pay contracts. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this subdivision, "open-ended promise-to-pay contract" means any agreement that obligates a patient to pay for health care services without prior disclosure of the specific amount to be charged. new text end new text begin (b) A health care provider is prohibited from requesting a patient to sign an open-ended promise-to-pay contract. new text end new text begin (c) All open-ended promise-to-pay contracts are void and unenforceable, except that open-ended promise-to-pay contracts executed before July 1, 2026, are not enforceable for services rendered on or after that date. new text end new text begin (d) Notwithstanding this subdivision, health care providers are permitted to require patients to sign agreements acknowledging financial responsibility only if the agreements: new text end new text begin (1) specify the provider's number, as defined in section 62J.826, subdivision 4; new text end new text begin (2) identify any services that may not be covered by insurance; and new text end new text begin (3) disclose the estimated patient responsibility based on the provider's number and the patient's insurance coverage. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 62J.826, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Definitions. (a) The definitions in this subdivision apply to this section. new text begin (b) "Baseline" means the allowable reimbursement amount for any health care service or item in the medical assistance program as established by the commissioner of human services. new text end deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (c)new text end "CDT code" means a code value drawn from the Code on Dental Procedures and Nomenclature published by the American Dental Association. deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (d)new text end "Chargemaster" means the list of all individual items and services maintained by a medical or dental practice for which the medical or dental practice has established a charge. deleted text begin (d)deleted text end new text begin (e)new text end "Commissioner" means the commissioner of health. deleted text begin (e)deleted text end new text begin (f)new text end "CPT code" means a code value drawn from the Current Procedural Terminology published by the American Medical Association. deleted text begin (f)deleted text end new text begin (g)new text end "Dental service" means a service charged using a CDT code. deleted text begin (g)deleted text end new text begin (h)new text end "Diagnostic laboratory testing" means a service charged using a CPT code within the CPT code range of 80047 to 89398. deleted text begin (h)deleted text end new text begin (i)new text end "Diagnostic radiology service" means a service charged using a CPT code within the CPT code range of 70010 to 79999 and includes the provision of x-rays, computed tomography scans, positron emission tomography scans, magnetic resonance imaging scans, and mammographies. deleted text begin (i)deleted text end new text begin (j)new text end "Hospital" means an acute care institution licensed under sections 144.50 to 144.58, but does not include a health care institution conducted for those who rely primarily upon treatment by prayer or spiritual means in accordance with the creed or tenets of any church or denomination. deleted text begin (j)deleted text end new text begin (k)new text end "Medical or dental practice" means a business that: (1) earns revenue by providing medical care or dental services to the public; (2) issues payment claims to health plan companies and other payers; and (3) may be identified by its federal tax identification number. new text begin (l) "Number" means the percentage of the baseline that a provider accepts as full payment for all services and items, expressed as a whole number, calculated in accordance with subdivision 4. new text end deleted text begin (k)deleted text end new text begin (m)new text end "Outpatient surgical center" means a health care facility other than a hospital offering elective outpatient surgery under a license issued under sections 144.50 to 144.58. deleted text begin (l)deleted text end new text begin (n)new text end "Standard charge" means the regular rate established by the medical or dental practice for an item or service provided to a specific group of paying patients. This includes all of the following: (1) the charge for an individual item or service that is reflected on a medical or dental practice's chargemaster, absent any discounts; (2) the charge that a medical or dental practice has negotiated with a third-party payer for an item or service; (3) the lowest charge that a medical or dental practice has negotiated with all third-party payers for an item or service; (4) the highest charge that a medical or dental practice has negotiated with all third-party payers for an item or service; and (5) the charge that applies to an individual who pays cash, or cash equivalent, for an item or service. Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 62J.826, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Provider numbers. new text end new text begin (a) By January 1, 2028, and each year thereafter, the commissioner of health must, for each provider subject to this section, determine and publicly publish the provider's number calculated in accordance with this subdivision. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner of health must calculate a provider's number by dividing each of a provider's current standard charges under subdivision 2 by each charge's baseline, multiplying the quotients by the percentage of the provider's total charges for which each standard charge accounts, and adding the products. new text end new text begin (c) For providers that render both facility-based and professional services, the commissioner of health must calculate and disclose two separate numbers as follows: new text end new text begin (1) a facility number for all hospital and facility charges, including inpatient, outpatient, emergency room, and surgical facility services; and new text end new text begin (2) a professional services number for all services provided by medical professionals, including ambulatory surgical centers and clinical services. new text end new text begin (d) Each provider must post the provider's number prominently in locations easily accessible to and visible by patients, including on the provider's website. new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 62J.826, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Consumer health information exchanges. new text end new text begin (a) Privately operated online platforms are authorized to aggregate data generated and provided to consumers and the commissioner of health under this section and to display health care provider information, including numbers, quality metrics, and patient reviews for consumer use. new text end new text begin (b) Consumer health information exchanges under paragraph (a) must be owned, controlled, and operated by private entities. Ownership, control, and operation by a health care provider, health care system, health plan company, pharmaceutical manufacturer, or medical device manufacturer is prohibited. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner of health must register consumer health information exchanges under paragraph (a). To be registered as a consumer health information exchange under this subdivision, an exchange must: new text end new text begin (1) demonstrate technical capability to securely receive, store, and display health care pricing and quality data; new text end new text begin (2) meet the independence requirements in paragraph (b); new text end new text begin (3) agree to display all provider data without bias or preferential treatment; new text end new text begin (4) implement consumer privacy protections; and new text end new text begin (5) maintain public accessibility to basic search functions without charge to consumers. new text end Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 62J.826, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Rulemaking. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of health must promulgate rules to implement subdivision 4. Rules promulgated under this paragraph must promote the following goals: new text end new text begin (1) establish a simple, universally understood number pricing system for all health care services and items based on a single number representing the percentage of medical assistance baseline rates; new text end new text begin (2) expose the current hidden tax paid by private pay patients through public disclosure of each provider's number; new text end new text begin (3) create a consumer-friendly health care marketplace where patients can easily compare prices and choose the patients' preferred providers; new text end new text begin (4) enable competition among health care providers and health plan companies; and new text end new text begin (5) eliminate surprise medical billing and price gouging. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner of health must promulgate rules to implement subdivision 5. Rules promulgated under this paragraph must promote the following goals: new text end new text begin (1) establish a framework for privately operated consumer health information exchanges; new text end new text begin (2) require health care providers to submit standardized data to registered exchanges; new text end new text begin (3) enable consumers to compare health care providers based on price, quality, and patient reviews; and new text end new text begin (4) protect consumer privacy while facilitating information sharing. new text end Sec. 7. new text begin [62K.16] REFERENCE-BASED PRICING HEALTH PLAN. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Provider" has the meaning given in section 62J.03, subdivision 8. new text end new text begin (c) "Reference-based pricing health plan" means a health plan in which the payer pays a set price for each service instead of negotiating prices with providers. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin General. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding any law to the contrary and upon any necessary federal approval, a health carrier that offers a health plan in the individual, small, or large group market must also offer in the market a reference-based pricing health plan that meets the requirements of this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Provider participation. new text end new text begin (a) An enrollee of a reference-based pricing health plan may access any health care provider who has agreed to: (1) a reimbursement rate up to but not greater than the reimbursement rate specified in the enrollee's reference-based pricing plan; and (2) any other terms and conditions offered by the health carrier. Any terms and conditions offered by the health carrier must be the same for all health care providers who agree to participate in the health plan. new text end new text begin (b) A health carrier may require a participating provider to meet reasonable data, utilization review, and quality assurance requirements. new text end new text begin (c) A provider who agrees to participate must provide services to all enrollees of the reference-based pricing plan if the provider's reimbursement rates are equal to or less than the reimbursement rate specified in the enrollee's reference-based pricing plan. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Reimbursement rates. new text end new text begin (a) The reimbursement rates offered to providers that agree to participate in a reference-based pricing health plan must be based on a percentage relative to the rates defined by the most recent medical assistance fee-for-service reimbursement fee schedules promulgated by the Department of Human Services. new text end new text begin (b) For services that do not have a corresponding medical assistance fee-for-service reimbursement value, the health carrier must negotiate the rates based on other fee schedules used within the health care market. new text end new text begin (c) If a reference-based pricing health plan's reimbursement rate is at least 190 percent above the medical assistance fee-for-service rate and the health plan is offered in all counties in Minnesota, the health plan is exempt from the geographic and network adequacy requirements under section 62K.10. new text end new text begin (d) A provider who agrees to participate in the reference-based pricing plan agrees to accept the reimbursement rate as payment in full under the terms of the plan in accordance with section 62K.11. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Conditions. new text end new text begin (a) Nothing in this section requires a provider to participate in a reference-based pricing health plan. A health carrier is prohibited from requiring the provider to participate in a reference-based pricing health plan as a condition of participation in any other health plan, product, or other arrangement offered by the health carrier. new text end new text begin (b) Nothing in this section requires a health carrier to provide coverage for a service or treatment that is not covered under the enrollee's health plan. new text end new text begin (c) A reference-based pricing health plan may impose cost-sharing requirements, including co-payments, deductibles, and coinsurance and reasonable referral and prior authorization requirements. new text end new text begin (d) Reference-based pricing health plans must cover all chiropractic services and items provided to enrollees who are 21 years of age or younger. new text end